Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4102
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act:

(1) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;

(2) Department means the Department of Labor;

(3)(a) Direct services means nursing services or other services provided to consumers through person-to-person contact; and

(b) Direct services does not mean:

(i) Services performed by an individual in a health care entity that do not involve the provision of any direct service to a consumer of a health care entity;

(ii) The practice of medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery by an individual licensed under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act; or

(iii) The practice of nursing by a nurse practitioner licensed under the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act;

(4) Health care entity means a health care facility or a health care service;

(5) Health care facility has the same meaning as in section 71-413;

(6) Health care service has the same meaning as in section 71-415;

(7) Health care staffing agency means an individual, a trust, a partnership, a corporation, a limited liability partnership, a limited liability company, or any other business entity that provides one or more temporary workers to provide direct services in a separate, third-party health care entity. Health care staffing agency includes a health care technology platform;

(8) Health care technology platform means an individual, a trust, a partnership, a corporation, a limited liability partnership, a limited liability company, or any other business entity that developed and operates, offers, or maintains a system or technology that provides a marketplace, by means of the Internet or a software application, which allows (a) a worker, in the sole discretion of such worker, to choose when and how often to utilize the platform to bid on or select an open shift posted by a health care entity and (b) a health care entity to set rates with the platform that can only be changed by a contractual amendment between the parties;

(9)(a) Nursing services means services that may be provided only by or under the supervision of a nurse; and

(b) Nursing services does not mean the practice of nursing by a nurse practitioner licensed under the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act; and

(10) Worker means an individual who contracts with or is employed by a health care staffing agency to provide direct services for a health care entity.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 8.
July 1, 2027